Maine, session 132, LD1300.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 11 MRSA §2-314-A is enacted to read:
§2-314-A. Implied warranty; seller notification and buyer complaints
(1). The Attorney General shall provide written notice of the implied warranty
provisions under sections 2-314 and 2-315 to sellers conducting business in the State
primarily through Internet-based sales who remit $10,000 or more in sales tax to the State.
(2). The Attorney General shall make available to buyers in the State an online
complaint form by which a buyer can submit to a seller a complaint regarding goods subject
to the implied warranty provisions under sections 2-314 and 2-315.